Nevada, session 83, AB105.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 202 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2, a person
shall not possess or cause a firearm to be present in, or within 100
feet of an entrance to, a place the person knows or reasonably
should know is an election site.
2. The provisions of subsection 1 do not apply to:
(a) A law enforcement officer who is employed by a federal,
state or local law enforcement agency and carrying out official
duties or who is off duty and lawfully carrying a concealed
firearm.
(b) A private security guard or other security personnel hired
or arranged for by the owner or manager of the facility or property
in which the election site is located.
(c) The possession of a firearm in a vehicle that is located
within 100 feet of an entrance to an election site, so long as the
person does not brandish the firearm or remove the firearm from
the vehicle.
(d) The otherwise lawful possession of a firearm in a
residence, in a business or on private property that is located
within 100 feet of an entrance to an election site.
3. A person shall not knowingly possess a firearm or cause a
firearm to be present at an election site with the specific intent to
disrupt, interfere with or monitor the administration of the
election, the counting of votes or any person who is voting or
attempting to vote.
4. A person who violates subsection 1 is guilty of a gross
misdemeanor.
5. A person who violates subsection 3 is guilty of a category D
felony and shall be punished as provided in NRS 193.130.
6. It is an affirmative defense to a charge made pursuant to
subsection 1 that, at the time of the alleged offense, the person was
lawfully in possession of the firearm and was traveling within 100
feet of an election site for the limited purpose of accessing private
property located within that area or departing from such private
property to reach a location beyond 100 feet of the election site.
This affirmative defense does not apply if the person:
(a) Intimidated or attempted to intimidate a voter;
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 3 –
(b) Interfered or attempted to interfere with the administration
of the election; or
(c) Entered or passed through an election site with the firearm
for any purpose other than to access or depart from private
property as described in this subsection.
7. During the period in which voting is conducted at an
election site, the county clerk, registrar of voters or city clerk, as
applicable, shall keep continuously posted at the outer limits of the
area where possession of a firearm is prohibited at least one sign
on which is printed in large letters “Distance Marker: The
carrying of firearms between this point and the election site is
prohibited.” The county clerk, registrar of voters or city clerk, as
applicable, shall ensure that any sign posted pursuant to this
subsection is:
(a) At least 17 inches by 11 inches in size;
(b) Affixed to a window or door of the election site or placed
on a freestanding sign; and
(c) Clearly visible to a person approaching the outer limits of
the area within which the possession of a firearm is prohibited.
8. A sign posted pursuant to subsection 7 may be produced in
conjunction with a sign posted pursuant to NRS 293.361, 293.740
or 293C.361, as applicable.
9. As used in this section, “election site” means any:
(a) Location being used as a polling place;
(b) Central counting place, as defined in NRS 293.0335; or
(c) Place a ballot box, as defined in NRS 293.026, or ballot
drop box is present.
Sec. 2. NRS 202.253 is hereby amended to read as follows:
202.253 As used in NRS 202.253 to 202.369, inclusive [:] ,
and section 1 of this act:
1. “Antique firearm” has the meaning ascribed to it in 18
U.S.C. § 921(a)(16).
2. “Explosive or incendiary device” means any explosive or
incendiary material or substance that has been constructed, altered,
packaged or arranged in such a manner that its ordinary use would
cause destruction or injury to life or property.
3. “Firearm” means any device designed to be used as a
weapon from which a projectile may be expelled through the barrel
by the force of any explosion or other form of combustion.
4. “Firearm capable of being concealed upon the person”
applies to and includes all firearms having a barrel less than 12
inches in length.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 4 –
5. “Firearms importer or manufacturer” means a person
licensed to import or manufacture firearms pursuant to 18 U.S.C.
Chapter 44.
6. “Machine gun” means any weapon which shoots, is
designed to shoot or can be readily restored to shoot more than one
shot, without manual reloading, by a single function of the trigger.
7. “Motor vehicle” means every vehicle that is self-propelled.
8. “Semiautomatic firearm” means any firearm that:
(a) Uses a portion of the energy of a firing cartridge to extract
the fired cartridge case and chamber the next shell or round;
(b) Requires a separate function of the trigger to fire each
cartridge; and
(c) Is not a machine gun.
9. “Unfinished frame or receiver” means a blank, a casting or a
machined body that is intended to be turned into the frame or lower
receiver of a firearm with additional machining and which has been
formed or machined to the point at which most of the major
machining operations have been completed to turn the blank, casting
or machined body into a frame or lower receiver of a firearm even if
the fire-control cavity area of the blank, casting or machined body is
still completely solid and unmachined.
Sec. 3. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2025.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)